Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.1641

Drifting.

"Drifting" means a driver intentionally oversteers a vehicle, causing loss of traction, while maneuvering a vehicle in a turning direction.

[ 2023 c 283 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 283: See note following RCW 46.04.367.